Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.110

Statewide drug prosecution assistance program—Advisory committee—Selection of project director.

There is established a statewide advisory committee comprised of the attorney general, the chief of the Washington state patrol, both United States attorneys whose offices are located in Washington state, and three county prosecuting attorneys appointed by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, who will also act as supervising attorneys. The statewide advisory committee shall select one of the supervising attorneys to act as project director of the drug prosecution assistance program.

[ 1989 c 271 s 237.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.